Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Title Five Tables

In recodifying Title 5, Act No. 222 of the 1985 Adjourned Session made substantial changes in the organization and content of the title.

Table 1 has been prepared in order to facilitate comparison of the provisions of former Title 5 with present Title 5. The table indicates the disposition in present Title 5 of sections appearing in former Title 5. Where sections in former Title 5 were omitted from the recodified title, an indication to that effect appears in the table.

Table 2 indicates the source, in former Title 5 or other titles, of the provisions in present Title 5. Where the section is entirely new, an indication to that effect appears in the table.

TABLE 1

TABLE OF
COMPARATIVE SECTIONS

FORMER 1986 SECTIONS RECODIFICATION Title Sec. Title Sec. 5 1 5 201 5 2 5 202 5 3 5 203 5 4 Omitted 5 5 Omitted 5 6 5 204 5 7 5 205 5 8 5 206 5 9 Omitted 5 10 5 207 5 11 Omitted 5 12 5 208 5 13 5 43 5 14 5 43 5 15 5 44 5 16 5 44 5 17 5 209 5 18 5 210 5 19 5 211 5 20 5 212 5 71 5 301 5 72 5 302 5 73 5 202 5 74 5 304 5 75 5 305 5 76 5 306 5 77 5 307 5 78 5 308 5 79 5 309 5 80 5 310 5 81 5 311 5 82 5 312 5 83 5 313 5 84 5 314 5 85 5 315 5 86 5 316 5 87 5 317 5 88 5 318 5 89 5 319 5 90 5 320 5 141 5 401 5 142 5 402 5 143 5 403 5 144 5 404 5 145 5 405 5 181 5 421 5 182 5 422 5 183 5 423 5 184 5 424 5 185 5 425 5 186 5 426 5 187 5 427 5 188 5 428 5 221 5 476 5 222 5 477 5 223 5 478 5 224 5 479 5 225 5 480 5 226 5 481 5 227 5 482 5 229 5 483 5 230 5 484 5 231 5 485 5 232 5 486 5 291 5 601 5 292 5 602 5 293 5 603 5 294 5 604 5 295 5 605 5 296 5 606 5 297 5 607 5 298 5 608 5 331 5 651 5 332 5 652 5 334 5 653 5 336 5 654 5 337 5 655 5 371 5 691 5 372 5 692 5 373 5 693 5 374 5 694 5 375 5 695 5 376 5 696 5 377 5 697 5 411 5 751 5 412 5 752 5 413 5 753 5 414 5 754 5 451 5 202 5 452 5 771 5 453 5 772 5 454 5 773 5 455 5 774 5 491 5 202 5 492 5 801 5 493 5 802 5 494 5 803 5 495 5 804 5 496 5 805 5 497 5 806 5 498 5 807 5 499 5 808 5 500 5 809 5 501 Omitted 5 551 5 1001 5 552 5 202 5 553 5 1002 5 554 5 1003 5 555 5 1004 5 556 5 1005 5 557 5 1006 5 558 5 1007 5 559 5 1008 5 560 5 1009 5 561 5 1010 5 562 5 1011 5 563 5 1012 5 564 5 1013 5 565 5 1014 5 566 5 1015 5 567 5 1016 5 568 5 1017 5 569 5 1018 5 570 5 1019 5 571 5 1020

Click to view